New York, session 2025-2026, A9153.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Upon a determination by the metropolitan transportation 2 authority or the New York city transit authority that sufficient funds 3 have been committed to it specifically for such purpose, the metropol- 4 itan transportation authority, the public benefit corporation created by 5 section 1263 of the public authorities law, and the New York city trans- 6 it authority, the public benefit corporation created by section 1201 of 7 the public authorities law, shall use such specifically committed funds 8 to rename the 190th Street subway station on the IND Eighth Avenue line 9 of the New York city subway to the 190th Street - Fort Tryon Park 10 station. The metropolitan transportation authority shall ensure that 11 all signs and any other items issued by the metropolitan transportation 12 authority are updated to accurately reflect the new name of the station. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 14 deemed repealed after the signs and any other items are accurately 15 updated. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13100-02-5